Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 9 Workers' Compensation
11-9-205. Administration of chapter — Staff and expenditures.

For the purpose of administering the provisions of this chapter, the Workers' Compensation Commission is authorized:

To make such rules may be found necessary;

To appoint and fix the compensation of temporary technical assistants and medical and legal advisers and to appoint and to fix the compensation of clerical assistants and other officers and employees; and

To make such expenditures, including those for personal service, rent, books, periodicals, office equipment, and supplies, and for printing and binding as may be necessary.

Prior to the adoption, prescription, amendment, modification, or repeal of any rule or form, the commission shall give at least forty-five (45) days' notice of its intended action.

The notice shall include a statement of the terms or substance of the intended action or description of the subjects and issues involved, and the time, place, and manner in which interested persons may present their views thereon.

The notice shall be mailed to any person specified by law or who shall have requested advance notice of rulemaking proceedings.

The commission shall afford all interested persons a reasonable opportunity to submit written data, views, or arguments, and, if the commission in its discretion shall so direct, oral testimony or argument.

Each rule or form adopted by the commission shall be effective twenty (20) days after adoption unless a later date is specified by law or in the rule itself.

All expenditures of the commission in the administration of this chapter shall be allowed and paid from the Workers' Compensation Fund upon the presentation of itemized vouchers approved by the commission.

The commission may appoint as many persons as may be necessary to be administrative law judges and in addition may appoint such examiners, rate experts, investigators, medical examiners, clerks, and other employees as it deems necessary to effectuate the provisions of this chapter, provided that the appointment of all rate experts shall be made by the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing, whose duty it is to approve the rates charged.

Rate experts shall be considered employees of the commission and the Department of Labor and Licensing and shall be paid from the Workers' Compensation Fund.

Employees appointed pursuant to this subsection shall receive an annual salary to be fixed by the commission within the appropriation made therefor.

It shall be the duty of an administrative law judge, under the rules adopted by the commission, to hear and determine claims for compensation and to conduct hearings and investigations and to make such orders, decisions, and determinations as may be required by any rule or order of the commission.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, §§ 42, 44, Acts 1949, p. 1420; 1975, No. 655, § 1; 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1342, 81-1344; Acts 2019, No. 315, §§ 777-779; 2019, No. 910, § 5357.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(1)(A); deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a)(2)(A); and deleted “regulation” following “Each rule” in (a)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing” for “Insurance Commissioner” in (b)(1); and substituted “Department of Labor and Licensing” for “Insurance Commissioner” in (b)(2).

11-9-206. Traveling expenses for members and employees.

Any member or employee of the Workers' Compensation Commission shall be entitled to receive his or her necessary traveling expenses actually incurred and for subsistence while traveling on official business and away from his or her designated station. The expenses shall be certified by the person who incurred them and shall be allowed and paid upon presentation of vouchers approved by the commission.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 45, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1346.

Cross References.

Compensation of State Boards, § 25-16-901 et seq.

11-9-207. Powers and duties.

In addition to its other duties and powers, the Workers' Compensation Commission is given and granted full power and authority:

To hear and determine all claims for compensation, including claims based upon injuries which occurred outside the State of Arkansas for which compensation is payable under this chapter;

To require and order medical services for and examinations of injured employees and to employ special medical examiners and advisors who shall be paid not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day and reasonable traveling expenses;

To approve claims for medical services and attorney's fees;

To excuse failure to give notice either of injury or death of any employee;

To approve agreements, make, modify, or rescind awards, and make and enter findings of fact and rulings of law;

To enter orders in appealed cases;

To determine the time for the payment of compensation and order the reimbursement of employers for amounts advanced;

To assess penalties;

To prescribe rules governing the representation of employees, employers, and carriers in respect to claims before the commission;

To issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and take testimony, by deposition or otherwise;

To make surveys and to determine the existence and prevalence of occupational disease hazards within this state, to determine the measures necessary to eliminate or reduce these hazards, and to add to the schedule of occupational diseases subject to appropriate conditions and after public hearing;

To make available all records in connection with all cases of personal injury to the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing. The secretary may propose rules for the prevention of injuries and transmit the rules to the commission. The commission may recommend proposed rules for prevention of injuries to the secretary;

To have and exercise all other powers and duties conferred or imposed by this chapter; and

To transfer the excess of income over expenses from the commission's annual educational conference to Kids' Chance of Arkansas, Inc., a nonprofit charitable organization designed to provide scholarships to children of workers who have been killed or become permanently and totally disabled from a compensable injury, including any accumulation from prior years' conferences.

In addition to the other powers and duties granted to the commission in this section and otherwise provided by law, the commission is authorized to establish and impose reasonable fees to recover the cost of preparation of various informative materials distributed by the commission.

The fees shall be established by rule of the commission.

Funds derived from fees shall be deposited into the Workers' Compensation Fund to be used to defray expenses incurred in preparation and distribution of materials.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 43, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1981, No. 630, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1343, 81-1343.1; Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 3; 2019, No. 315, §§ 780, 781; 2019, No. 910, §
5358.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 12, provided:

“All laws and parts of laws expressly in conflict with this act are repealed. No part of Act 796 of 1993 shall be impliedly repealed by this act or Act 1552 of 1999.”

Publisher's Notes.

The schedule of occupational diseases referred to in subdivision (a)(11) appears to have been eliminated by the 1976 amendment to § 11-9-602.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(9); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (a)(12), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing” for “Director of the Department of Labor” and substituted “secretary” for “director” twice.

11-9-208. Biennial report.

On or before the first day of the regular session of the General Assembly, the Workers' Compensation Commission under the authority of at least two (2) of its members shall make to the Governor and to the General Assembly a report of the administration of this chapter for the preceding biennial period, together with such recommendations as the commission may deem advisable.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 46, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1347.

11-9-209. Statistical data collection.

The Workers' Compensation Commission shall publish annually, on an aggregate basis, information pertaining to the distribution of workers' compensation insurance premiums, losses, expenses, and net income to be compiled from reports required to be filed with the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing pursuant to § 23-63-216, as amended, or any similar information required to be filed by the secretary regarding workers' compensation insurance.

The commission shall also publish in that same annual report information regarding aggregate workers' compensation benefit distribution to claimants, medical providers, and attorneys if that specific information or similar information becomes available from revised or additional reporting requirements that may be required by the secretary.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1060, § 7; 2019, No. 910, §
5359.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing” for the first occurrence of “Insurance Commissioner” and substituted “secretary” for the second occurrence of “Insurance Commissioner”; and substituted “secretary” for “Insurance Commissioner” in (b).

11-9-210. Purchase of annuity contracts — Funding of Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund obligations.

The Workers' Compensation Commission is hereby authorized to fund financial obligations of the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund through the purchase of structured annuity contracts. Provided, the commission shall purchase such annuity contracts only when the commission determines that it is financially advantageous to the trust fund involved.

Structured annuity contracts shall be purchased only from insurance companies:

Licensed to do business in Arkansas and authorized to write annuities as regulated by the State Insurance Department;

Experienced in the business of writing and administering structured annuities;

Determined to be financially sound and having an A.M. Best rating of A+ and category size VIII or greater, or equivalent independent industry rating; and

Be rated AA+ or better by Standard and Poor's, Moody's, or an equivalent rating by an equivalent rating service.

Structured annuity contracts purchased by the commission shall:

Include a separate contract for each claimant or beneficiary covered;

Require that the payments to the claimant or beneficiary be sent to the commission so that it can maintain administrative control over the payments, and the commission will distribute the payments in full to the claimants or beneficiaries; and

Provide for return of principal to the appropriate fund in the event that the obligations of the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund to any claimant or beneficiary cease prior to the end of the period certain guarantee in the contract.

The commission shall adopt such appropriate rules consistent with the provisions of this section, § 23-96-104(16) and (25), and § 23-96-114(f) and (g) as it deems necessary to enable it to efficiently and effectively administer the provisions of this section, § 23-96-104(16) and (25), and § 23-96-114(f) and (g) and any structured annuity arrangement it may enter into pursuant to the authority granted herein.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 651, §§ 1, 3; 2019, No. 315, §
782; 2019, No. 382, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 382 substituted “§
23-96-104(16) and (25), and §
23-96-114(f) and (g)” for “§§
23-96-104O(2) and X(2) and 23-96-114F and G” twice in (b).

Subchapter 3
— Funds — Taxes and Fees

Effective Dates.

Acts 1979, No. 253, § 12: Mar. 2, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Worker's Compensation law are in urgent need of revision to more clearly define the benefits to be provided by Worker's Compensation coverage; that this Act is designed to provide such clarification and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 393, § 2: Mar. 10, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that passage of this Act is necessary to enable the Workers' Compensation Commission to fully discharge the financial obligations of the State of Arkansas by providing additional revenue generating potential within current statutory taxation authority. Further, it is also determined that the only acceptable method for assuring payment of benefits under the workers' compensation law pertaining to death and permanent total disability payments is to change the procedure for assessment and collection of premium and self-insurers' taxes. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, and the continued solvency of the Workers' Compensation Fund, the Second Injury Trust Fund, and the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 98, § 13: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1985 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1985 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1987, No. 680, § 20: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1987 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1987 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 10: Nov. 6, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, meeting in Third Extraordinary Session, that the current funding of the Arkansas Insurance Department is inadequate; that additional funds are immediately necessary to finance the collection of workers' compensation premium taxes by the Insurance Department; and further that this act will provide additional needed funds to the State Insurance Department. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 652, § 18: Mar. 24, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that current revenues supporting the operation and activities of the Arkansas Insurance Department are insufficient for efficient and productive operation of the Insurance Department in view of its myriad duties to protect the insurance-buying consumers of this State and to regulate the Arkansas activities of insurers, insurance agents and similar licensees, and professional bail bond companies. The provisions of this Act are essential to the operations of the Arkansas Insurance Department and delay in the effective date of this Act could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1318, § 19: Apr. 20, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Workers' Compensation System is in dire need of change which will require budgetary increases to the Arkansas Workers' Compensation Commission to effectively manage the changes to the workers' compensation law. An emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect upon approval and signature by the Governor.”

11-9-301. Funds established.

There are established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, three (3) separate funds:

The “Workers' Compensation Fund”;

The “Second Injury Trust Fund”; and

The “Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund”.

Except for funds transferred into the General Revenue Fund Account specified in § 11-9-303(c) or other sections of this subchapter, no money shall be appropriated from these funds for any purpose except for the use and benefit, or at the direction of, the Workers' Compensation Commission.

All funds established pursuant to this section shall be administered, disbursed, and invested under the direction of the commission.

All incomes derived through investment of the Workers' Compensation Fund, the Second Injury Trust Fund, and the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund shall be credited, as investment income, to the fund that participated in the investment. For the purpose of investment, Workers' Compensation Fund moneys shall be invested in accordance with the State Treasury Management Law, § 19-3-501 et seq.

Except for moneys transferred into the General Revenue Fund Account specified in § 11-9-303(c) or other sections of this subchapter, all moneys deposited to the aforementioned funds shall not be subject to any deduction, tax, levy, or any other type of assessment.

If, on or after July 1, 1983, the balance in the Second Injury Trust Fund becomes insufficient to fully compensate those employees to whom it is obligated, payment shall be suspended until such time as the Second Injury Trust Fund is capable of meeting its obligations, paying all arrearages, and restoring normal benefit payments. In no event shall there be any reverter of responsibility to the employer or carrier on or after July 1, 1983.

Upon the effective maturity dates of each investment, the investment shall be transferred to the Treasurer of State for deposit into the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund created in this section.

The free balances of the Death and Permanent Total Disability Bank Fund shall be transferred to the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 47, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1979, No. 253, § 10; 1981, No. 290, § 13; 1983, No. 393, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1348; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 22, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 1179, § 8.

Cross References.

Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund, § 19-5-925.

Second Injury Trust Fund, § 19-5-911.

Workers' Compensation Fund, § 19-5-924.

11-9-302. Qualifying fees for carriers, third-party administrators, and self-insurers.

Each carrier writing compensation insurance in this state shall pay to the Insurance Commissioner, in addition to the premium taxes and fees now required under existing laws, at the time of securing the first license to transact business in the state the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for the privilege of qualifying with the Workers' Compensation Commission for the writing of compensation insurance.

At the time of qualifying, each self-insurer or third-party administrator shall pay to the commission the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for the privilege of qualifying as a self-insurer or third-party administrator.

All carriers, self-insurers, or third-party administrators qualifying under the provisions of this chapter shall be required to pay this initial assessment before they shall be qualified.

These fees shall be deposited into the Workers' Compensation Fund created in § 11-9-301.

The commission may assess a third-party administrator an annual fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 47, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1979, No. 253, § 10; 1983, No. 393, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1348; Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 12, provided:

“All laws and parts of laws expressly in conflict with this act are repealed. No part of Act 796 of 1993 shall be impliedly repealed by this act or Act 1552 of 1999.”

11-9-303. Payment of tax by carrier — Definition.

In addition to the premium taxes collected from carriers, the carriers shall pay annually to the Workers' Compensation Commission a tax, at the rate to be determined as provided in § 11-9-306 but not to exceed three percent (3%), on all written manual premiums resulting from the writing of workers' compensation insurance on risks within the state.

Upon the final payment of the liabilities of the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund under § 11-9-502, the tax rate under this section shall not exceed one and five-tenths percent (1.5%).

“Written manual premium” means premium produced in a given year by the manual rates in effect during the experience period and shall exclude the premium produced by the expense constant. Furthermore, “written manual premium”, for the purpose of this chapter, means premium before any allowable deviated discounts, any experience rating modification, any premium discount, any reinsurance or deductible arrangement as common with fronting carriers, any dividend consideration, or other trade discount.

This tax shall be collected by the commission from the carriers at the same time and in the same manner as insurance premium taxes under § 26-57-601 et seq. and deposited into the funds created in § 11-9-301.

This transfer from the funds created in § 11-9-301 shall be in the same proportions that deposits were made into the three (3) funds as set forth in § 11-9-306(a)-(c).

Assessments upon which premium taxes are based shall be made on forms prescribed by the commission and shall be paid to the commission.

Absent a waiver obtained from the commission for good cause, the failure of the licensed carrier to pay the assessment when due shall be referred to the Insurance Commissioner for appropriate administrative action against the Arkansas certificate of authority of the delinquent insurer.

Premium tax payments shall be made by check payable to the commission.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 47, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1979, No. 253, § 10; 1983, No. 393, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1348; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 3; 1993, No. 652, § 14; 2001, No. 1757, § 5; 2005, No. 505, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 12, provided:

“All laws and parts of laws expressly in conflict with this act are repealed. No part of Act 796 of 1993 shall be impliedly repealed by this act or Act 1552 of 1999.”

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 4 and 5 added (a)(2).

11-9-304. Payment of tax by self-insurer.

The Workers' Compensation Commission shall collect a tax from every self-insured employer at a rate to be determined as provided by § 11-9-306 but not to exceed three percent (3%) of the written manual premium which would have to be paid under § 11-9-303 by a carrier if the self-insured employer were insured by a carrier.

Upon the final payment of the liabilities of the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund pursuant to § 11-9-502, the tax rate under this section shall not exceed one and five-tenths percent (1.5%).

If the tax provided for under this section is not paid within thirty (30) days of the date provided in § 11-9-306, there shall be assessed a penalty for each thirty (30) days the amount so assessed remains unpaid which is equal to ten percent (10%) of the unpaid amounts and which shall be collected at the same time as a part of the tax assessed.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 47, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1979, No. 253, § 10; 1983, No. 393, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1348; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 2; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 4 and 5 added (a)(2); and substituted “The Workers’ Compensation Commission shall” for “It shall be the duty of the Workers’ Compensation Commission to” in (a)(1).

11-9-305. Payment of tax by public employer.

The Workers' Compensation Commission shall collect a tax from every public employer providing workers' compensation coverage to its employees at a rate to be determined as provided by § 11-9-306 but not to exceed three percent (3%) of the written manual premium which an insurance carrier would have to pay under § 11-9-303 if the public employer were insured by a carrier.

Upon the final payment of the liabilities of the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund under § 11-9-502, the tax rate under this section shall not exceed one and five-tenths percent (1.5%).

The commission shall tabulate and collect the tax to be collected from entities whose workers' compensation claims are administered by the Public Employee Claims Division.

In tabulating the manual premium, a public employer whose workers' compensation claims are administered by the division shall use the average compensation rate for this state as promulgated by the National Council on Compensation Insurance, Inc. for the tax year in question.

The tax collected shall be deposited in and paid to the commission from the Workers' Compensation Revolving Fund and miscellaneous revolving funds.

In the event that any public employer whose workers' compensation claims are administered by the division fails to cooperate in furnishing information upon which the tax will be computed or fails to pay the tax within thirty (30) days of the date provided in § 11-9-306, the commission shall notify the Director of the Public Employee Claims Division of the failure, and the commission shall decertify the public employer from participation in the state's workers' compensation program.

In the event of decertification, the public employer shall obtain its employer's workers' compensation liability coverage from the private market and shall not be entitled to participate in the state's workers' compensation program for a period of one (1) year thereafter.

The procedure for decertification shall be the same as for the revocation or termination of the self-insurer privilege.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 47, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1983, No. 393, § 1; 1985, No. 98, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1348; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 4; 1993, No. 1318, § 12; 2005, No. 505, § 2; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 3; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 4 and 5 added (a)(1)(B); and substituted “The Workers’ Compensation Commission shall” for “It shall be the duty of the Workers’ Compensation Commission to” in (a)(1)(A).

11-9-306. Determination of surplus and rate of taxation.

The Workers' Compensation Commission, on or before December 31 of each year, shall determine the surplus, if any, in the Workers' Compensation Fund, together with the additional amounts necessary to properly administer this chapter for the ensuing year.

The commission shall determine the rate of taxation for collections for that year on or before March 1 of the following year.

The commission, on or before December 31 of each year, shall determine the surplus, if any, in the Second Injury Trust Fund, together with the additional amounts necessary to properly administer this chapter for the ensuing year.

The commission shall determine the rate of taxation for collections for that year on or before March 1 of the following year.

The commission, on or before December 31 of each year, shall determine the surplus, if any, in the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund, together with the additional amounts necessary to properly administer this chapter for the ensuing year.

The commission shall determine the rate of taxation for collections for that year on or before March 1 of the following year.

The total rate of taxation for all three (3) funds when added together shall not exceed three percent (3%).

Upon the final payment of the liabilities of the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund under § 11-9-502, the tax rate under this section shall not exceed one and five-tenths percent (1.5%).

The commission shall notify each insurance carrier of the rate of taxation applicable to each fund for the preceding year, and taxes shall be computed and paid pursuant to the provisions of § 11-9-303(c) on or before April 1 of the following year.

The commission shall notify each self-insured employer subject to the tax of the rate of taxation applicable to each fund for the preceding year, and taxes shall be computed by the commission and paid to each fund by the self-insurer through payments made directly to the commission on or before April 1 of the following year.

The commission shall notify each public employer subject to this tax of the rate of taxation applicable to each fund for the preceding year, and taxes shall be computed by the commission and paid to each respective fund through payments made directly to the commission by the public employer on or before April 1 of the following year.

The commission shall have the authority to promulgate rules for administration of the assessment and tax collection process, including, but not limited to, rules applicable to the funds established in § 11-9-301.

No later than March 30 each year, the commission shall provide the Insurance Commissioner a complete listing of workers' compensation premium tax collections for the preceding calendar year, including the monetary amount of workers' compensation premium tax paid, by year, by name of workers' compensation carrier, and by National Association of Insurance Commissioners identity number.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 47, Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1979, No. 253, § 10; 1983, No. 393, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1348; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 5; 2005, No. 505, § 3; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 4; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 783.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 4 and 5 added (d)(2).

The 2019 amendment, in (f), deleted “or regulations” following “promulgate rules” and deleted “and regulations” preceding “applicable”.

11-9-307. Certification of cost of administering Public Employee Claims Division.

During the biennial period beginning July 1, 1989, and thereafter, the State Insurance Department shall certify to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the cost of administering the Public Employee Claims Division.

The certification shall be made the month following each quarter of the fiscal year and shall include a report of the expenditures of the division for workers' compensation claims paid on behalf of the cities, the counties, and the public schools, each of the three (3) reported as a class of employers, and each state agency supported from treasury funds or fund accounts.

After the certification has been received and approved by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer funds from the Public School Fund, the Municipal Aid Fund, the County Aid Fund, and from the various treasury funds of state agencies to the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account.

The transfers shall be made in the same proportion that payments were made in behalf of that entity for workers' compensation claims in the prior quarter as certified by the department.

The amount transferred shall be the proportional cost associated with the fund as certified to and approved by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

Should a state agency be supported from more than one (1) treasury fund, the fund transfers from that agency shall be in the same proportion that appropriations were made to that agency for regular salaries from the respective funds.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 680, § 16; 2011, No. 980, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment deleted “Services” preceding “Fund Account” in (c).